src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON xnc
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom: PxK ;      ! jiddisch
 :i x3_oblique_sg ; ! jiddischin
  x3_pl ;         ! jiddischit
 +Pl+Ill:i^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;       ! 



!! #### The i>e-family; kivi, kieli, käsi, lumi etc

LEXICON n4
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kivi, stem kive
 +N: x4 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^E2I   K ; ! kivi
 +N+Sg+Nom:       Px ; ! kivensä
 +N+Sg+Par:%>^A   PxK ; ! kiveä
 +N+Nom:^E2I      R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%> n_PxK ; !TEST moving from x4_pl


LEXICON x4
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  veri
x4_sg ;
x4_pl ;

LEXICON n4_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x4_pl ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%> n_PxK ; !TEST moving from x4_pl


LEXICON x4_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** shared lexica for n4, n5, n5_lumi/loimi/lapsi EXCEPT SgNom, SgPar
+Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ; ! veren
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:^WG%>le PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;
 +Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK;

LEXICON x4_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2I%>tte n_PxK ;
 !+Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%> n_PxK ; !test moving to n4_pl
 +Pl+Par:^E2I%>^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG^E2I%>ss^A PxK ; !NY ändr neråt
 +Pl+Ela:^WG^E2I%>st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^WG^E2I%>le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG^E2I%>l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^WG^E2I%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^E2I%>n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^WG^E2I%> TRA ;
 +Pl+Abe:^E2I%>tt^A PxK;


LEXICON n5
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kieli, stem kiele
 +N: x5_sg ;
 +N: x5_pl ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%> n_PxK ; !TEST moving from x4_pl


 LEXICON x5_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kieli, stem kiele
 x4_sg ;
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       PxK ; ! kieli
 +Sg+Par:%>t^A      PxK ; ! kieltä
 +Nom:^E2I R ;
 +Gen:^WG%>n R ;

LEXICON x5_pl
x4_pl ;

LEXICON n5_kieli
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kieli, stem kiele
 n5 ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>te n_PxK ; ! kielten

LEXICON n5_lumi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** lumi, stem lu
 +N:me x4 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:mi       PxK ; ! lumi
 +N+Sg+Par:ne%>t^A      PxK ; ! lunta
 +N+Nom:mi R ;
 +N+Gen:me%>n R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:mi2e%> n_PxK ; 


LEXICON n5_loimi 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** loimi, stem loi, som n5_lumi PLUS partitiv loimea
n5_lumi ;
+N+Sg+Par:me%>^A      PxK ; ! loimea


LEXICON n5_vuosi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** vuosi> vuoessa/vuessa, stem ELLER vu
 +N+Nom:osi R ;
 +N:ote x5_kasi ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:osi       PxK ; ! vuosi
 +N+Sg+Par:ot%>t^A      PxK ; ! vuotta
 +N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ess^A PxK ; !
 +N+Sg+Ine:u%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:u%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:o%>n^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess+Err/Orth:o%>nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ue%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:^WG%>e TRA ;

LEXICON n5_kasi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** käsi, stem kä
 +N:te x5_kasi ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:si       PxK ; ! käsi
 +N+Sg+Par:t%>t^A      PxK ; ! kättä
 +N+Nom:si R ;
 +N+Gen:e%>n R ;

LEXICON n5_kasi_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  continuation for kasi_pl
+N: x5_kasi_pl ;

LEXICON x5_kasi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  veri
x4_sg ;
x5_kasi_pl ;

LEXICON x5_kasi_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2I%>tte n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^E2Ie%> n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:^E2I%>^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^E2I^WG%>ss^A PxK ; !NY ändr neråt
 +Pl+Ela:^E2I^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^E2I^WG%>le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^E2I^WG%>l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^E2I^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^E2I%>n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^E2I^WG%> TRA ;
 +Pl+Abe:^E2I%>tt^A PxK;

LEXICON n5_lapsi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Sg+Nom:psi R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:pse%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Nom:psi       PxK ; ! lapsi
+N+Sg+Gen:pse%> n_PxK ; ! lapsen
+N+Sg+Par:s%>t^A      PxK ; ! lasta
+N+Sg+Ill:ps%>hee n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ine:pse%>ss^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ela:pse%>st^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+All:pse%>le PxxK ;
+N+Sg+Ade:pse%>l^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Abl:pse%>lt^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ess:pse%>n^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Tra:pse TRA ;
+N+Sg+Abe:pse%>tt^A PxK ;

+N+Pl+Nom:pse%> t_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:s%>te n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:ps%>i^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:ps%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ine:ps%>i2ss^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ela:ps%>ist^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:ps%>ile PxxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:ps%>il^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:ps%>ilt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ess:ps%>in^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:psi TRA ;
+N+Pl+Abe:ps%>itt^A PxK ;

!LEXICON n5_ie
!!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 2-syll ordinary nouns ending with -i; malmi, äiti, poiting to x5_i
!x5_ie_sg ;
!x5_ie_pl ;

!LEXICON x5_ie_sg
!+N: x1_sg ;
!+N+Sg+Nom: PxK ; 
!+N+Nom: R ;
!+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;

!LEXICON x5_ie_pl 
!+N: x5_i_pl ;
!+N+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ; !malmia, äitiä 

LEXICON n5_ie_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
!+N: x1_sg ;
+N+Nom: R ;
+N+Sg+Nom: PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;  
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ;  
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;      
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;      
+N+Sg+All:^WG%>lle PxxK ;      
+N+Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;      
+N+Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;      
+N+Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;          
+N+Sg+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;       
+N+Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;    

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ; !alttaria
+N+Pl+Par:^IDEL%>e%>it^A PxK ; !alttareita
+N+Pl+Gen:%>e n_PxK ; !alttarien
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>tte n_PxK ;!alttaritten
+N+Pl+Gen:^IDEL%>e%>itte n_PxK ;!alttareitten
!+N+Pl+Ill:^IDEL%>e^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  ! saunhoin 
!+N+Pl+Ill:^IDEL%>e^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  ! sauhnoin 
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ine:^IDEL%>e^WG%>iss^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ela:^IDEL%>e^WG%>ist^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:^IDEL%>e^WG%>ile PxxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:^IDEL%>e^WG%>il^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:^IDEL%>e^WG%>ilt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:^IDEL%>e^WG%>i TRA ; 
+N+Pl+Ess:^IDEL%>e%>in^A PxK ; !malmina, äitinä
+N+Pl+Abe:^IDEL%>e^WG%>itt^A PxK ;

!LEXICON n5_takki
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** same as n5_ie except Pl+Part: takki>takkeja 
! +N: x1_sg ;
! +N: x5_i_pl ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:   PxK ; 
! +N+Nom: R ;
! +N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;

LEXICON n5_nuoret_pl !Temp lexica?
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** same as n1_pl except Pl+Gen: nuoret>nuorten 
:e n1_pl ;
+N+Pl+Gen:%>te n_PxK ;

LEXICON n5_i_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** cont lexica for type n1-words ending with -i
+N: x5_i_pl ;

LEXICON x5_i_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** cont lexica for type n1-words ending with -i
+Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
+Pl+Par:^IDEL%>e%>j^A PxK ;
+Pl+Gen:%>e n_PxK ;
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>tte n_PxK ;
+Pl+Ill:^IDEL%>e^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  ! saunhoin 
+Pl+Ill:^IDEL%>e^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  ! sauhnoin 
+Pl+Ine:^IDEL%>e^WG%>iss^A PxK ;
+Pl+Ela:^IDEL%>e^WG%>ist^A PxK ;
+Pl+All:^IDEL%>e^WG%>ile PxxK ;
+Pl+Ade:^IDEL%>e^WG%>il^A PxK ;
+Pl+Abl:^IDEL%>e^WG%>ilt^A PxK ;
+Pl+Tra:^IDEL%>e^WG%>i TRA ; 
+Pl+Ess:^IDEL%>e%>in^A PxK ; !malmina, äitinä
+Pl+Abe:^IDEL%>e^WG%>itt^A PxK ;


!! #### The nainen (nen) and hevonen (3nen) family

LEXICON nen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bisyllabic nainen stem nai
nen_sg ;
nen_pl ;

LEXICON nen_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xnen_sg ;
!+N+Sg+Nom:s PxK ; #?
!+N+Sg+Gen:s PxK ; #?
+N+Sg+Gen:s R ;

LEXICON nen_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xnen_pl ;

LEXICON xnen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
xnen_sg ;
xnen_pl ;

LEXICON xnen_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Sg:se 2cases ; !!≈ @CODE@ for  Ade, All, Ess lla, lle, nna
xnen_common_sg ;
+Der/suus:suu n_uus ;

LEXICON xnen_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Pl:se%>i2 2cases ;
 xnen_common_pl ; ! all other cases
+Pl+Gen:s%>te n_PxK ; !NB as err/orth in xnen_common


LEXICON 3nen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** odd-syllabic hevonen stem hevose
+N: x3nen ;
+N+Sg+Gen:s R ;

LEXICON x3nen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
x3nen_sg ;
x3nen_pl ;

LEXICON x3nen_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Sg:se 3cases ; ! Ade, All, Ess lla, lle, nna
xnen_common_sg ;

LEXICON x3nen_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Pl:se%>i2 3cases ;
 xnen_common_pl ; ! all other cases

LEXICON xnen_common_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:ne n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:se^WG%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:shee n_PxK ;    ! liikheen, säkheen
 +Sg+Ine:se%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:se%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:se%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:se%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:se TRA ;
