src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
keskenaikanen:kesken#aika 3nen ;
poikalapsi:poika#la n5_lapsi ;
likkalapsi:likka#la n5_lapsi ;
rintalapsi:rinta#la n5_lapsi ;
kusilapsi:kusi#la n5_lapsi ;
kasvattilapsi:kasvatti#la n5_lapsi ;
jumalanlapsi:jumalan#la n5_lapsi ;
lapsenlapsi:lapsen#la n5_lapsi ;
orpolapsi:orpo#la n5_lapsi ;
ottolapsi:otto#la n5_lapsi ;
pikkulapsi:pikku#la n5_lapsi ;
imulapsi:imu#la n5_lapsi ;
nisälapsi:nisä#la n5_lapsi ;
keränalanen:keränala 3nen ;
parempiosanen:parempiosa 3nen ;
pihet:pihe n4_pl ;
pajapihet:pajapihe n4_pl ;
kirsilohi:kirsi#lohe n5 ;
kesälohi:kesä#lohe n5 ;
jouhi:jouhe n5 ;
purjet:purje n4_pl ;
koijunkylki:koijun#kylke n4 ;
viinahenki:viina#henke n4 ;
poski:poske n4 ;
kirkonväki:kirkon#väke n4 ;
minuriteettikieli:minuriteetti#kiele n5_kieli ;
latinankieli:latinan#kiele n5_kieli ;
laukunkieli:laukun#kiele n5_kieli ;
pitkäkieli:pitkä#kiele n5_kieli ;
jääkieli:jää#kiele n5_kieli ;
ilomieli:ilo#miele n5 ;
pakkapuoli:pakka#puole n5 ;
muoripuoli:muori#puole n5 ;
persheenpuoli:persheen#puole n5 ;
kevätpuoli:kevät#puole n5 ;
makkarasuoli:makkara#suole n5 ;
huuli:huule n5 ;
pohjatuuli:pohja#tuule n5_kieli ;
vastatuuli:vasta#tuule n5_kieli ;
luettuuli:luet#tuule n5_kieli ;
lihaliemi:liha#lie n5_loimi ;
makkaraliemi:makkara#lie n5_loimi ;
vasikanliemi:vasikan#lie n5_loimi ;
kalanliemi:kalan#lie n5_loimi ;
iloliemi:ilo#lie n5_loimi ;
pottuliemi:pottu#lie n5_loimi ;
maaniemi:maa#nie n5_loimi ;
villaloimi:villa#loi n5_loimi ;
tärkkiloimi:tärkki#loi n5_loimi ;
kankhaanloimi:kankhaan#loi n5_loimi ;
ostoloimi:osto#loi n5_loimi ;
lähetystoimi:lähetys#toi n5_loimi ;
helmi:helme n4 ;
lumi:lu n5_lumi ;
pohjalumi:pohja#lu n5_lumi ;
vuotatelumi:vuotate#lu n5_lumi ;
vitilumi:viti#lu n5_lumi ;
valinkolumi:valinko#lu n5_lumi ;
pakkaslumi:pakkas#lu n5_lumi ;
mätälumi:mätä#lu n5_lumi ;
nätälumi:nätä#lu n5_lumi ;
höttölumi:höttö#lu n5_lumi ;
kalaonni:kala#onne n4 ;
vikatheensiipi:vikatheen#siipe n4 ;
maatusaari:maatu#saare n4 ;
veri:vere n5 ;
nuoret:nuor n5_nuoret_pl ;
kuunvuoret:kuun#vuore n4_pl ;
jalkavesi:jalka#ve n5_kasi ;
valtavesi:valta#ve n5_kasi ;
juevesi:jue#ve n5_kasi ;
ylivesi:yli#ve n5_kasi ;
lahtivesi:lahti#ve n5_kasi ;
painovesi:paino#ve n5_kasi ;
pottuvesi:pottu#ve n5_kasi ;
vaaralahti:vaara#lahte n4 ;
peurankynsi:peuran#kyn n5_kasi ;
viljavuosi:vilja#vu n5_vuosi ;
kuolemavuosi:kuolema#vu n5_vuosi ;
naimavuosi:naima#vu n5_vuosi ;
ohravuosi:ohra#vu n5_vuosi ;
murevuosi:mure#vu n5_vuosi ;
uusivuosi:uusi#vu n5_vuosi ;
katovuosi:kato#vu n5_vuosi ;
karkausvuosi:karkaus#vu n5_vuosi ;
ituvuosi:itu#vu n5_vuosi ;
ikävuosi:ikä#vu n5_vuosi ;
nöyrävuosi:nöyrä#vu n5_vuosi ;
jyvävuosi:jyvä#vu n5_vuosi ;
käsivarsi:käsi#var n5_kasi ;
marjanvarsi:marjan#var n5_kasi ;
kynnyshirsi:kynnys#hir n5_kasi ;
viikkokausi:viikko#kau n5_kasi ;
mustakivi:musta#kive n4 ;
kelitalvi:keli#talve n4 ;
väliovi:väli#ove n4 ;
tyvi:tyve n4 ;
kulhainen:kulhai 3nen ;
kansalainen:kansalai nen ;
pellavainen:pellavai nen ;
riihi:riihe n5 ;
mökkinen:mökki 3nen ;
kasuaminen:kasuami nen ;
koti-ihminen:koti-ihmi 3nen ;
kaveri:kaveri n5_ie_odd ;
yksinen:yksi 3nen ;
naistentauvit:naisten#taut n5_i_pl ;
lähtiäinen:lähtiäi nen ;
liekonen:lieko 3nen ;
kuormahevonen:kuorma#hevo 3nen ;
vattanalhaiset:vattanalhai nen_pl ;
lehmällaskiaiset:lehmällaskiai nen_pl ;
maistiaiset:maistiai nen_pl ;
peijaiset:peijai nen_pl ;
piihraiset:piihrai nen_pl ;
makkeiset:makkei nen_pl ;
vaimoliset:vaimoli nen_pl ;
mynttiset:myntti nen_pl ;
hautajäiset:hauta#jäi nen_pl ;
jäniksenkepposet:jäniksenkeppo nen_pl ;
hyttyset:hytty nen_pl ;
kasuvet:kasuve n5_kasi_pl ;
koskunen:kosku 3nen ;
kryppynen:kryppy 3nen ;
kläppönen:kläppö 3nen ;
siihainen:siihai nen ;
harjakaiset:harjakai nen_pl ;
hurmahenkinen:hurmahenki nen ;
muinaispohjosmaankieli:muinaispohjosmaankiele n5_kieli ;
ittekillaaminen:ittekillaami nen ;
ameriikankieli:ameriikankiele n5_kieli ;
naasarettilainen:naasarettilai nen ;
pakkosyöminen:pakkosyömi nen ;
lautauspuoli:lautauspuole n5 ;
ruuhmiinkieli:ruuhmiinkiele n5_kieli ;
rejistreeraminen:rejistreerami nen ;
bärlokki:bärlokki n5_ie_odd ;
kolpeaminen:kolpeami nen ;
työnohjaaminen:työnohjaami nen ;
englantinkieli:englantinkiele n5_kieli ;
